Washington statutes.
RCW 18.185.040

License applications.

(1) Applications for licenses required under this chapter shall be filed with the director on a form provided by the director. The director may require any information and documentation that reasonably relates to the need to determine whether the applicant meets the criteria, including fingerprints.

(2) Applicants for licensure or endorsement as a bail bond recovery agent must complete a records check through the Washington state patrol criminal identification system and through the federal bureau of investigation at the applicant's expense. Such record check shall include a fingerprint check using a Washington state patrol approved fingerprint card. The Washington state patrol shall forward the fingerprints of applicants to the federal bureau of investigation for a national criminal history records check. The director may accept proof of a recent national crime information center/III criminal background report or any national or interstate criminal background report in addition to fingerprints to accelerate the licensing and endorsement process. The director is authorized to periodically perform a background investigation of licensees to identify criminal convictions subsequent to the renewal of a license or endorsement.

[ 2004 c 186 s 4; 1993 c 260 s 5.]

NOTES:

Legislative recognition—2004 c 186: See note following RCW 18.185.010.